Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 50. Farm Machinery and Equipment.

§ 3.2-5000.
Sale of farm machinery or equipment where serial number has been removed, defaced or obliterated; penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale in the Commonwealth any new agricultural implement, farm tractor, or other type of farm machinery or equipment, knowing that the manufacturer’s original serial number has been removed, defaced, or in any way obliterated. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. A person convicted of a second or subsequent offense under this subsection is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

The dealer in farm equipment who possesses for sale any farm implement or machinery that has had its serial number removed, defaced, or in any way obliterated, shall have his supplier stamp, attach or scribe, as was originally done, the same serial number as was placed upon the machine or implement at the time of its manufacture. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prevent any manufacturer or importer, or his agents, other than dealers, from doing his own numbering on agricultural implements, farm tractors, or other types of farm machinery or equipment, or parts, removed or changed, and replacing the numbered parts.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-707; 1952, c. 672; 1966, c. 702, §

13.1-918

; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12B M.J. Markets and Marketing, § 6.